test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-moksha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - мокша: # Ordinary nouns 'Moksha' - full paradigm including MWN
     мокша+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: мокша
     мокша+N+SP+Gen+Indef: мокшень
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+Indef: мокшеда
     мокша+N+SP+Dat+Indef: мокшенди
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+Indef: мокшефтома
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+Indef: мокшешка
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+Indef: мокшеса
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+Indef: мокшеста
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+Indef: мокшес
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+Indef: мокшева
     мокша+N+SP+Tra+Indef: мокшекс
     мокша+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мокшезе
     мокша+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мокшене
     мокша+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: мокшезень
     мокша+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мокшенень
     мокша+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [мокшезти, мокшезенди]
     мокша+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мокшененди
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: мокшедон
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: мокшефтомон
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: мокшешкан
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: мокшесон
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: мокшестон
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: мокшезон
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: мокшеван
     мокша+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мокшеце
     мокша+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мокшетне
     мокша+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мокшецень
     мокша+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мокшетнень
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: мокшедот
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: мокшефтомот
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: мокшешкат
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: мокшесот
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: мокшестот
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: мокшезт
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: мокшеват
     мокша+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мокшец
     мокша+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мокшенза
     мокша+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мокшенц
     мокша+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мокшензон
     мокша+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мокшенцты
     мокша+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: мокшензонды
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: мокшедонза
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: мокшефтомонза
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: мокшешканза
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: мокшесонза
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: мокшестонза
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: мокшезонза
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: мокшеванза
     мокша+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: мокшеньке
     мокша+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: мокшеньконь
     мокша+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: мокшеньконди
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: мокшедонк
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: мокшефтомонк
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: мокшешканк
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: мокшесонк
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: мокшестонк
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: мокшезонк
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: мокшеванк
     мокша+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: мокшенте
     мокша+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: мокшентень
     мокша+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: мокшентенди
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: мокшедонт
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: мокшефтомонт
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: мокшешкант
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: мокшесонт
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: мокшестонт
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: мокшезонт
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: мокшевант
     мокша+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: мокшесна
     мокша+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: мокшеснон
     мокша+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: мокшеснонды
     мокша+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: мокшедост
     мокша+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: мокшефтомост
     мокша+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: мокшешкаст
     мокша+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: мокшесост
     мокша+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: мокшестост
     мокша+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: мокшезост
     мокша+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: мокшеваст
     мокша+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: мокшет
     мокша+N+Sg+Nom+Def: мокшесь
     мокша+N+Sg+Gen+Def: мокшеть
     мокша+N+Sg+Dat+Def: мокшети
     мокша+N+Pl+Nom+Def: мокшетне
     мокша+N+Pl+Gen+Def: мокшетнень
     мокша+N+Pl+Dat+Def: мокшетненди    
     мокша+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: мокшеня
